Connecticut, session 2026, HB05520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 26-136 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
[(a) Upon petition of ten or more persons owning property above any
dam or artificial obstruction existing on October 1, 1982, built upon any
stream, the commissioner shall determine whether such dam or artificial
obstruction shall be provided by the person, firm, corporation or
municipality or political subdivision thereof, owning or controlling the
dam or obstruction with a suitable fishway for the passage of fish. Upon
receipt of an application for a permit to construct, rebuild or
substantially repair a dam or artificial obstruction built upon any
stream, the commissioner shall require the dam or artificial obstruction
be provided with a fishway if such a facility is necessary to protect
fisheries resources by providing access to natural spawning or nursery
areas or to protect the public interest by preventing the loss of a fishery
from the area of the dam or artificial obstruction. For the purposes of
this section, "rebuild" or "substantially repair" means any action altering
the structure of the dam or artificial obstruction, changing the use of the
dam or artificial obstruction or impeding the available free passage of
fish.
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5520
(b) Within thirty days from the receipt of such petition or application,
the commissioner shall set a time and place for a hearing thereon, if in
the opinion of the commissioner a hearing is reasonable or necessary.
(c) Upon determination that a fishway is necessary, the commissioner
shall issue an order to the person, firm, corporation or municipality or
political subdivision thereof owning or controlling the dam or
obstruction to construct a fishway in the form, material, capacity, at such
location and within such time as the commissioner establishes. The
commissioner shall cause a copy of the order to be served on the person,
firm, corporation or municipality or political subdivision thereof. Such
fishway shall be constructed and maintained subject to the approval of
the commissioner, and shall be kept open and free for the passage of
such fish in such manner and during such period as the commissioner
requires. If no such period is specified by the commissioner, it shall be
kept open and free from April first to November first in each year.]
(a) Any person may submit a petition to the Commissioner of Energy
and Environmental Protection for a safe, timely and effective fish
passage for any hydroelectric dam that is not subject to the jurisdiction
of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. Upon the submittal of
such a petition, the commissioner shall determine whether there is a
safe, timely and effective fish passage for migratory fish at all life stages
upstream and downstream of such dam and associated reservoir. For
purposes of this section, a fish passage is deemed safe, timely and
effective if it meets or exceeds the Connecticut River Migratory Fish
Restoration Cooperative's fish passage standards developed by the
Connecticut River Atlantic Salmon Commission.
(b) If the commissioner determines that there is not a safe, timely and
effective fish passage, the commissioner shall prescribe, by order, issued
to the person, firm, corporation or municipality, or political subdivision
thereof, that owns or controls such dam, the conditions to ensure such a
safe, timely and effective fish passage both upstream of such reservoir
and downstream of such dam. Such conditions may include, but shall
not be limited to, requirements to (1) construct, rebuild and operate
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5520
fishways, (2) remove any artificial obstructions, and (3) maintain
minimum water flows. If the commissioner determines that any existing
fish passage structures are ineffective or harmful to aquatic life, the
commissioner shall include conditions to remediate such harm,
including, but not limited to, removal or reconstruction of the fish
passage structures.
(c) Not later than one hundred eighty days after submittal of any such
petition, the commissioner shall publish notice of the commissioner's
tentative determination as to whether there is a safe, timely and effective
fish passage. If the commissioner determines that there is not a safe,
timely and effective fish passage, the commissioner shall publish a draft
order in the commissioner's notice of tentative determination. Such
notice shall be published on the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection's Internet web site. The commissioner shall
provide a public comment period on such tentative determination of not
less than thirty days following publication of such tentative
determination and the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection shall hold a public hearing before making any final
determination on such petition. The person, firm, corporation or
municipality, or political subdivision thereof, that owns or controls any
dam that is the subject of such a public hearing shall be deemed to be a
party to such hearing.
(d) For any dam or artificial obstruction not subject to the provisions
of subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner shall, upon petition of
ten or more persons that own property above any such dam or artificial
obstruction existing on October 1, 1982, built upon any stream,
determine whether such dam or artificial obstruction shall be provided,
by the person, firm, corporation or municipality, or political subdivision
thereof, that owns or controls such dam or obstruction, with a suitable
fishway for the passage of fish.
(e) Upon receipt of any application for a permit to construct, rebuild
or substantially repair a dam or artificial obstruction built upon any
stream, as described in subsection (d) of this section, the commissioner
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5520
shall require such dam or artificial obstruction be provided with a
fishway if such a facility is necessary to protect fisheries resources by
providing access to natural spawning or nursery areas or to protect the
public interest by preventing the loss of a fishery from the area of the
dam or artificial obstruction. For the purposes of this subsection,
"rebuild" or "substantially repair" means any action altering the
structure of the dam or artificial obstruction, changing the use of the
dam or artificial obstruction or impeding the available free passage of
fish.
(f) Not later than thirty days after receipt of such a petition, as
described in subsection (d) of this section, or an application, as described
in subsection (e) of this section, the commissioner shall set a time and
place for a hearing on such petition or application, as applicable, if, in
the opinion of the commissioner, a hearing is reasonable or necessary.
100 (g) Upon a determination that a fishway is necessary pursuant to
101 subsection (d) or (e) of this section, as applicable, the commissioner shall
102 issue an order to the person, firm, corporation or municipality, or
103 political subdivision thereof, that owns or controls such dam or
104 obstruction to construct a fishway in the form, material, capacity, at such
105 location and within such time as the commissioner establishes. The
106 commissioner shall cause a copy of such order to be served on such
107 person, firm, corporation or municipality, or political subdivision
108 thereof. Such fishway shall be constructed and maintained subject to the
109 approval of the commissioner, and shall be kept open and free for the
110 passage of such fish in such manner and during such period as the
111 commissioner requires. If no such period is specified by the
112 commissioner, such fishway shall be kept open and free from April first
113 to November first in each year.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 26-136
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5520
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5